South Dakota, session 2026, HB1159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a moratorium is imposed
on any new or expanding industrial dairy operation that is permitted as a concentrated
animal feeding operation under chapter 34A-2 and granted a conditional use permit by
any county in this state, if the number of animal units at the new or expanding operation
is to exceed seven thousand four hundred ninety-nine dairy cows.
Currently permitted and operating dairy operations may continue to operate at the
scale identified in any permit approved prior to July 1, 2026.
The purpose of the moratorium is to:
(1) Allow the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources to undertake an
interdisciplinary process of data collection, review, consideration, and analysis of
the potential economic and environmental impacts of industrial dairy operations in
this state, and to make results available to the public; and
(2) Allow county governments time to update comprehensive land use plans and
ordinances to match the scale of industrial dairy operations by:
(a) Requiring road agreements between townships and industrial dairy
operations as part of conditional use permit approvals; and
(b) Implementing incremental, increasing setbacks proportional to the size of
an industrial dairy operation; and
(3) Allow the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources to determine whether
it has adequate resources to determine the impact of industrial dairy operations on
the watersheds of this state.
For purposes of this section, "industrial dairy operation" means a dairy with more
than seven thousand four hundred ninety-nine head of dairy cows.
The moratorium is in effect through June 30, 2028.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.756.9 2 1159


Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.